Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.120

Complaints—Investigations—Hearings—Remedies—Transition assistance for students.

(1) Complaints may be filed under this chapter only by a current student or exiter of a program or training affected by an unfair business practice. The complaint shall set forth the alleged violation and shall contain information required by the agency on forms provided for that purpose. A complaint may also be filed with the agency by an authorized staff member of the agency or by the attorney general.

(2) The agency shall investigate any complaint under this section and shall first attempt to bring about a negotiated settlement. The agency director or the director's designee may conduct an informal hearing with the affected parties in order to determine whether a violation has occurred.

(3) If the agency finds that the private vocational school or its agent engaged in or is engaging in any unfair business practice, the agency shall issue and cause to be served upon the violator an order requiring the violator to cease and desist from the act or practice and may impose the penalties provided under RCW 28C.10.130. If the agency finds that the complainant has suffered loss as a result of the act or practice, the agency may order the violator to pay full or partial restitution of any amounts lost. The loss may include any money paid for tuition, required or recommended course materials, and any reasonable living expenses incurred by the complainant during the time the complainant was enrolled at the school.

(4) The complainant is not bound by the agency's determination of restitution. The complainant may reject that determination and may pursue any other legal remedy.

(5) The violator may, within twenty days of being served any order described under subsection (3) of this section, file an appeal under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Timely filing stays the agency's order during the pendency of the appeal. If the agency prevails, the appellant shall pay the costs of the administrative hearing.

(6) If a private vocational school closes without providing adequate notice to its enrolled students, the agency shall provide transition assistance to the school's students including, but not limited to, information regarding: (a) Transfer options available to students; (b) financial aid discharge eligibility and procedures; (c) the labor market, job search strategies, and placement assistance services; and (d) other support services available to students.

[ 2014 c 11 s 7; 2007 c 462 s 3; 1993 c 445 s 3; 1990 c 188 s 10; 1989 c 175 s 83; 1986 c 299 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 188: See note following RCW 28C.10.020.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.